Hawaii statutes.
§9-4 Student art work. The foundation,
in consultation with the department of education, the University of Hawaii,
private schools, and community art groups, shall establish a program for the
recognition and display of student art work. Student art work shall mean any
work of art made by any student attending any elementary, intermediate, high
school, college, or university in the State.

Recognition shall be through the sponsoring of
student art exhibits and the granting of scholarships, monetary awards, or
certificates to the student whose art work is being recognized. Any funds
appropriated to the foundation may be used for the recognition of student art
work. Student art work recognized under this section may be acquired for the
purpose of temporary or permanent display in state buildings and public
facilities pursuant to section 103-8.5. [L 1977, c 112, pt of §2; am L 1989, c
389, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next